Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.342

University site dedicated for street and boulevard purposes—Local assessments barred against site.

No assessments for the opening, improvement or maintenance of any public street upon the tracts of land described in RCW 28B.20.340 shall ever be levied, assessed or collected upon any portion of section 16, township 25 north, range 4 east, W.M., or upon any portion of blocks 7 and 8 Lake Washington shorelands.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.342. Prior: 1913 c 24 s 2. Formerly RCW 28.77.290.]